Hawaii statutes.
§334-106 License or accreditation required.
Facilities operated pursuant to this part shall be licensed under existing
licensing categories, including provisional licenses, or accredited pursuant to
section 321-193(10). Facilities operated pursuant to section 334-103(1) or (2)
to provide services to mentally ill adults shall be licensed, including
provisional licenses. Facilities operated to provide services to mentally ill
adults pursuant to section 334-103(3) or (4) shall be accredited rather than licensed.
The director shall review the appropriateness of these licensing and
accreditation categories. If the director determines that new licensing or
accreditation categories are necessary, the director shall issue a report and
recommendation to the legislature. [L 1980, c 221, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L
1986, c 237, §3; am L 2002, c 54, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next